src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! Northern Haida nouns can inflect for definiteness, reflexive possession and plurality.


LEXICON Common
+N+Indef: # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-AAL
+N+Indef:áal # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:al%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:al%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-AAN
+N+Indef:áan # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:an%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:an%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-AANG
+N+Indef:áang # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:ang%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:ang%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-AAD
+N+Indef:áad # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:ad%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:ad%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-AAW
+N+Indef:áaw # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:uw%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:uw%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-UU
+N+Indef:úu # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:uw%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:uw%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-UUD
+N+Indef:úud # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:ud%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:ud%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-IID
+N+Indef:íid # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:ad%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:ad%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-IIS
+N+Indef:íis # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:aj%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:aj%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-WAANG
+N+Indef:wáang # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:ung%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:ung%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-WAAN
+N+Indef:wáan # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:un%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:un%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-WAAL
+N+Indef:wáal # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:ul%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:ul%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-II
+N+Indef:íi # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:iy%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:iy%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-HL
+N+Indef:hl # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:l%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:l%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Common-S
+N+Indef:s # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:j%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:j%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON Y-Def
+N+Indef:áa # ; 
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:%>áa%^DEFy # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:%>%^DEFée # ;

LEXICON BodyPart
+N+Abs: # ;
+N+Rfx:%>áng # ;

LEXICON Kinterm
+N+Sg+Abs: # ;
+N+Rfx:%>áng # ; !! Does Rfx override Pl, or other way around?
+N+Pl+Abs:%>äláng # ;

LEXICON Indec
+N+Indef: # ;
+N+Def: # ; !! Need to make Massett dialect -ee versions for Indec ending in -aay

LEXICON S-Def
+N+Indef: # ;
+N+Def:%>%^DEFs # ;

LEXICON GAAY
+N+Indef: # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:%>%^DEFgáay # ; 
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:%>%^DEFgée # ; 

LEXICON GAAY-Short
+N+Indef:áa # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:%>%^DEFgáay # ; 
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:%>%^DEFgée # ; 

LEXICON GAAY-N
+N+Indef: # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:n-%>%^DEFgáay # ; 
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:n-%>%^DEFgée # ; 

LEXICON Human
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:%>äláng # ;

LEXICON NAAY
+N+Indef:a # ; 
+N+Indef+Dial/NOT-M:áay # ; 
+N+Indef+Dial/NOT-A:ée # ; 
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:%>%^DEFáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:%>%^DEFée # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-M:%>%^DEFagáay # ;
+N+Def+Dial/NOT-A:%>%^DEFagée # ;

LEXICON Proper
+N: # ;

LEXICON Location
+N: # ;
