src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
an Indec "year" ;
galíibs+CL/Shape+CL/skáa:galíibs Common "grape" ; ! def galíibsgaay
gíit'ii Kinterm "an animal's offspring, young" ; ! rfx: gíit'aang
gwáahl+CL/Shape+CL/tl'a:gwáa Common-HL "empty bag, sack, handbag, purse, wallet" ; ! def gwáalaay
gyáat'aad+CL/Shape+CL/gi:gyáat' Common-AAD "ceremonial robe or blanket" ; ! def gyáat'adaay
g̲aa% xajúu S-Def "little child" ; ! pl g̲aa% xadláa
g̲ad% skáahlaaw:g̲ad% skáahl Common-AAW "loose aged salmon eggs mixed with a few fresh cooked ones" ; ! def g̲ad skáahluwaay
g̲ándl% hlg̲eeláa S-Def "well" ;
g̲áw% x̲áng% t'álg% ts'a% sk'asíid Common "pipefish, pinfish, needlefish" ; ! def not attested, just assumed
g̲ud% skáa'alaangwaa S-Def "old-fashioned Chinese-made trunk with leather and brass trim" ; ! def g̲ud skáa'alaangwaas
g̲udgwáa% tl'áas% x̲aad'áay Indec "the last people on earth, all people forever, generation after generation" ;
híilaang:híil Common-AANG "thunder" ; ! def híilangaay
hldanáaw:hldan Common-AAW "a meal, meal time" ; ! def hldanawáay
hlk'i% tl'agáa:hlk'i% tl'ag Y-Def "breechcloth" ; ! def hlk'i tl'agáay
hlk'uwíi BodyPart "pulp, the remains of berries, bast, etc. after the juice has been extracted" ;
hlk̲'agíid:hlk̲'ag Common-IID "branch shelter" ; ! def hlk̲'agadáay
ináahlgaal:ináahlg Common-AAL "natural crook in a tree" ; ! def ináahlgalaay
jad% hlg̲agán+CL/Shape+CL/hlg̲a:jad% hlg̲agán GAAY "porch, platform extending in front of a traditional house, traditional-style toilet" ; ! def jad hlg̲agán-gaay
jagw% k'ujúu+CL/Shape+CL/sk'a:jagw% k'uj Common-UU "pistol" ; ! def jagw k'ujuwáay
Júus% x̲aat'áay Proper "Jews, Jewish people" ;
kíihljaaw% k̲agáan:kíihljaaw% k̲ag Common-AAN "mourning song" ; ! def kíihljaaw k̲aganáay
kínhlaaw+CL/Shape+CL/sk̲'a:kínhlaaw Common "spear" ; ! def kínhlaawaay
kunáasdgaay Kinterm "one's older siblings" ;
kúnt'gwaang:kúnt'g Common-WAANG "sandhopper, beachhopper, sand fleas" ; ! def kúnt'gungaay
k'aayhlt'áa% sk'awíi S-Def "falling star" ;
k'aayst'áa+CL/Shape+CL/cha:k'aayst' GAAY-Short "sweater" ; ! def k'aayst'gáay
k̲aj% ts'a% dáang% 'la'áay Human "barber" ;
k̲áagaal% náay:k̲áagaal% n NAAY "outhouse" ; ! def k̲áagaal nagáay
k̲án% tíigaa% gyáat'aad:k̲án% tíigaa% gyáat' Common-AAD "black wool shawl with silk tassles" ; ! def k̲án tíigaa gyáat'adaay
k̲án% tlamad BodyPart "one's clavicle" ;
k̲áysgwaan:k̲áysg Common-WAAN "(one's) body odor" ; ! def k̲áysgunaay
k̲áysgwaan:k̲áysg Common-WAAN "daddy-longlegs spider" ; ! def k̲áysgunaay
k̲ehjgadáay Indec "one's appearance" ;
k̲íidaaw:k̲íid Common-AAW "warriors, war party, raiders" ; ! def k̲íiduwaay
k'ínaan:k'ín Common-AAN "moss" ; ! def k'ínanaay
k̲u% hlk̲'at'íis+CL/Shape+CL/hlk̲'a:k̲u% hlk̲'at' Common-IIS "board fence, handrail, bannister" ; ! def k̲u hlk̲'at'ajáay
k̲u% hlk̲'at'íis+CL/Shape+CL/hlk̲'a:k̲u% hlk̲'at' Common-IIS "board fence" ; ! def k̲u hlk̲'at'ajáay
k̲ugíin% k̲'áal GAAY "(empty) envelope, paper bag" ; ! def k̲ugíin k̲'áalgaay
k'uk'áal+CL/Shape+CL/sk'a:k'uk' Common-AAL "a spit (of land), sandbar, reef, shallow area" ; ! def k'uk'aláay
k'uu% gyáat'aad:k'uu% gyáat' Common-AAD "marten skin robe" ; ! def k'uu gyáat'adaay
k̲últ'gwaang:k̲últ'g Common-WAANG "jumping beetle" ; ! def k̲últ'gungaay
k̲waa% tl'ahláa+CL/Shape+CL/k̲'íi:k̲waa% tl'ahl Y-Def "rock hammer" ; ! def k̲waa tl'ahláay
k̲wíi:k̲w Common-II "sky" ; ! def k̲wiyáay
k̲wíiyaaw+CL/Shape+CL/hlk̲'uhl:k̲wíiy Common-AAW "stationary cumulous cloud" ; ! def k̲wíiyuwaay
k'ya'ált'gwaang:k'ya'ált'g Common-WAANG "dunlin, western sandpiper" ; ! def k'ya'ált'gungaay
k̲'adsíi Location "area down on the beach, area out to sea" ;
k̲'amahl+CL/Shape+CL/tl'a:k̲'ama Common-HL "razor clam" ; ! def k̲'amaláay
k̲'ánggwdaang:k̲'ánggwd Common-AANG "kindness" ; ! def k̲'ánggwdangaay
k̲'íijuu:k̲'íij Common-UU "hump, solid projection" ; ! def k̲'íijuwaay
K̲'íis% x̲aad'áay Proper "Alaskan Haida people, Kaigani Haida people" ;
k̲'íits'iid% 'la'áay Human "policeman, jailkeeper" ;
k̲'íit'aas+CL/Shape+CL/cha:k̲'íit' Common-S "small berry basket (or other container)" ; ! def k̲'íit'ajaay
k̲'íit'gwaang+CL/Shape+CL/skáa:k̲'íit'g Common-WAANG "western black currant" ; ! def k̲'íit'gungaay
k̲'íntl'eehl:k̲'íntl'ee Common-HL "spring (season)" ; ! def k̲'íntl'eelaay
k̲'úl:k̲'ú2l Common "roots" ; ! def k̲'uláay
k̲'wíi:k̲'w Common-II "soil, earth, ground, dirt" ; ! def k̲'wiyáay
láam% náay:láam% n NAAY "saloon, bar" ; ! def láam nagáay
mas:ma Common-S "vermillion" ; ! def majáay
múulaa:múul GAAY-Short "sawmill" ; ! def múulgaay, ~múulaagaay
náad Kinterm "nephew, niece" ;
náag% sk̲'agíid Indec "beams forming the top edge of a stockade" ;
sáaldaan:sáald Common-AAN "steaming pit (in which food is cooked)" ; ! def sáaldanaay
sáanaa% náay:sáanaa% n NAAY "living room" ; ! def sáanaa nagáay
sdáagins+CL/Shape+CL/tl'a:sdáagins GAAY "stockings" ; ! def sdáaginsgaay
sdáng Common-AAL "charcoal, coal" ; ! def sdángalaay
sdláagwaal+CL/Shape+CL/t'áw:sdláag Common-WAAL "spoon" ; ! def sdláagulaay
sgagúud:sgag Common-UUD "short-finned pilot whale, fin-back whale" ; ! def sgagudáay
sgánsgwaan:sgánsg Common-WAAN "dry punky rotten wood or tree" ; ! def sgánsgunaay
sgánsgwaan+CL/Shape+CL/gi:sgánsg Common-WAAN "light brown Hudson's Bay trade blanket" ; ! def sgánsgunaay
sgúusiid+CL/Shape+CL/skáa:sgúus Common-IID "potato" ; ! def sgúusadaay
sg̲aláang+CL/Shape+CL/sg̲a:sg̲al Common-AANG "song" ; ! def sg̲alangáay
Sg̲áan% 'Láanaa Proper "town of the Killerwhale People" ;
sg̲áan BodyPart "one’s own supernatural power, spirit, shamanic familiar" ; ! rfx sg̲áanang
sk'angíid:sk'ang Common-IID "wild lily-of-the-valley (plant or leaf)" ; ! def sk'áangadaay
sk'ayúu:sk'ay Common-UU "robin" ; ! def sk'ayuwáay
stlagáa+CL/Shape+CL/sda:stlag Y-Def "bracelet" ; ! def stlagáay
stl'a% gudíis+CL/Shape+CL/skáa:stl'a% gud Common-IIS "thimbleberry" ; ! def stl'a gudajáay
stl'ánhlaal:stl'ánhl Common-AAL "mixture of boiled salalberries and fresh Maianthemum berries" ; ! def stl'ánhlalaay
st'a% k'ún+CL/Shape+CL/gu:st'a% k'ún BodyPart "one's toenail" ; ! rfx st'a k'unáng
st'áwdalaang Indec "long red worms found on the beach" ;
st'íi% k̲éeng% 'la'áay Human "doctor" ;
súljuus% gyaa% náay:súljuus% gyaa% n NAAY "barracks" ;
táatl'aad:táatl' Common-AAD "Dolly Varden char" ; ! def táatl'adaay
tlag% t'isdgáansii Location "the mainland" ;
Tlak'áas Proper "Tlak'aas" ;
tláas+CL/Shape+CL/sk̲'a:tláa Common-S "tree limb with no branchlets" ; ! def tláajaay
tlúu% k̲agáan:tlúu% k̲ag Common-AAN "canoe song, paddling song" ; ! def tlúu k̲aganáay
tl'áayuu+CL/Shape+CL/skáa:tl'áay Common-UU "spool of thread" ; ! def tl'áayuwaay
tl'ánts'uud:tl'ánts' Common-UUD "Stellar's jay" ; ! def tl'ánts'udaay
Ts'aagws% k̲'áajaa:Ts'aagws% k̲'áaj GAAY-Short "pink pitch used as chewing gum" ; ! def Ts'aagws k̲'áajgaay
ts'áagwaal+CL/Shape+CL/hlk̲'a:ts'áag Common-WAAL "frond of sword fern, maidenhair fern, male fern" ; ! def ts'áagulaay
ts'áagwaal+CL/Shape+CL/hlk̲'uhl:ts'áag Common-WAAL "sword fern, maidenhair fern, male fern" ; ! def ts'áagulaay
ts'áan% tl'at'áas+CL/Shape+CL/cha:ts'áan% tl'at'áa Common-S "large basket for carrying dry items (usually made of spruce root)" ; ! def ts'áan tl'at'ajáay
ts'ée'ii Kinterm "crew, members of a group, inhabitants" ;
t'áws'waal:t'áws'w Common-WAAL "small piece of driftwood" ; ! def t'áws'ulaay
xabtl'íid+CL/Shape+CL/skáa:xabtl' Common-IID "soapberry" ; ! def xabtl'adáay
xahl% tl'ajáaw+CL/Shape+CL/tl'a:xahl% tl'ajáaw Common "sheet metal" ; ! def xahl tl'ajáawaay
xwáasdaa% gwáahl+CL/Shape+CL/cha:xwáasdaa% gwáa Common-HL "full gunny sack, burlap bag, sack" ; ! def xwáasdaa gwáalaay
x̲aad% majáa:x̲aad% maj Y-Def "ochre" ; ! def x̲aad majáay
X̲aadas% gáwjaawaa GAAY "Haida drum" ; ! def x̲aadas gáwjaawaagaay
X̲aadas% táawaa:X̲aadas% táaw GAAY-Short "Haida food, foods from the traditional Haida diet (esp. fish)" ; ! def x̲aadas táawgaay
x̲idsíi Location "area under, below, downstairs from something" ;
yáanaang:yáan Common-AANG "fog, clouds" ; ! def yáanangaay
kyáasii Location "the area outside, the yard" ;
hlg̲ángulaa% 'la'áay Human "worker" ;
